Mississippi, session 2026, HB440.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration to provide funding to the Second Chance Outreach Learning Center to be used for conducting free adult literacy and basic vocational training for young men and women to have job opportunities and securing a location and operational supplies in direct support of the center for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027...... $ 30,000.00 SECTION 2.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.